Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT RESPONSE TEAM.new text end new text begin $250,000 for fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to a nonprofit organization to fund a Community Engagement Response Team (CERT) in the Rochester area. The team must be comprised of community leaders and volunteers and focus on improving public safety by acting as a liaison between the Black community and law enforcement, and on curating opportunity, mediating problems, and providing advocacy for the Black, Indigenous, and people of color (BIPOC) community. new text end